Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 7 Administration of Estates Generally

Cross references.

Jurisdiction of judge of probate court to grant administration on estates generally, §

15-9-31

.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-7-1

through

53-7-1

91, and was based on Laws 1764, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 301-303; Laws 1791, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 309; Laws 1792, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 287, 288, 307, 309; Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 288, 310, 312, 472; Laws 1804, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 291; Laws 1805, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 314; Laws 1810, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 316, 317; Laws 1812, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 318; Laws 1815, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 319; Laws 1820, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 484; Laws 1821, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 293, 321; Laws 1828, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 326, 327; Laws 1829, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 327; Laws 1840, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 332; Laws 1843, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 333, 474; Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 335; Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 336; Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 338, 339, 340; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 91, §§ 16, 17; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 235, §§ 1,
3-5; Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 36, § 1; Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 70, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 145, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 147, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 152, § 1; Ga. L. 1857, p. 60, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1857, p. 61, § 1; Ga. L. 1857, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1858, p. 58, § 1; Ga. L. 1860, p. 33, § 1; Ga. L. 1861, p. 33, § 1; Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 138, § 1; Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2389, 2407, 2409, 2414, 2415, 2417, 2463, 2468-2486, 2490-2502, 2504, 2506-2512, 2556-2558, 2561-2570, 3295, 3296, 3298-3300, 3372, 3373, 3404, 3405, 3492; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 47, § 1; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 49, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 84, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 87, § 2; Ga. L. 1866, p. 23, § 1; Ga. L. 1866, p. 66, § 1; Ga. L. 1866, p. 67, §§ 1, 2; Code 1868, §§ 2385, 2403, 2405, 2410, 2411, 2413, 2460, 2466-2484, 2488-2502, 2504-2512, 2557-2559, 2561, 2563-2572, 3307, 3308, 3310-3312, 3391, 3392, 3423, 3424, 3515; Ga. L. 1868, p. 15, § 1; Ga. L. 1872, p. 31, § 1; Code 1873, §§ 2420, 2438, 2440, 2445, 2447, 2449, 2499, 2505-2523, 2527-2540, 2542, 2543,
2545-2553, 2598-2600, 2602, 2604-2613, 3383, 3384, 3386-3388, 3439, 3440, 3473, 3474, 3573; Ga. L. 1877, p. 19, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 2420, 2438, 2440, 2445, 2447, 2449, 2499, 2505-2523, 2527-2540, 2542, 2543, 2545-2553, 2598-2600, 2602, 2604-2613, 3383, 3384, 3386-3388, 3439, 3440, 3473, 3474, 3573; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 75, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 140, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 142, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3278, 3307, 3309, 3313, 3315, 3317, 3361, 3370, 3373-3375, 3396-3414,
3418-3431, 3433, 3434, 3436-3444, 3493-3497, 3499-3513,
3515-3520, 5036, 5037; Ga. L. 1899, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1900, p. 51, § 1; Ga. L. 1901, p. 40, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3852, 3883, 3885, 3889, 3891, 3893, 3937, 3946, 3949-3951,
3972-3990, 3994-4007, 4009, 4010, 4012-4020, 4073-4075, 4077, 4079-4093, 4095-4100, 5619, 5618; Ga. L. 1920, p. 79, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 3-502, 3-503, 113-1216 through 113-1220, 113-1222 through 113-1226, 113-1229 through 113-1231, 113-1401 through 113-1408, 113-1411 through 113-1414, 113-1501 through
113-1516, 113-1521 through 113-1526, 113-1528, 113-1601 through 113-1605, 113-1901 through 113-1905, 113-2101 through 113-2105, 113-2107 through 113-2110, 113-2201 through 113-2209, 113-2301 through 113-2312; Ga. L. 1935, p. 326, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 409, §§ 1-3, 5-11; Ga. L. 1947, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 823, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, p. 451, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 502, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 657, §§ 12, 15-18, 24; Ga. L. 1959, p. 99, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 136, § 6; Ga. L. 1964, p. 211, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 269, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 438, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 474, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 164, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 433, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 633, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 447, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 455, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1972, p. 558, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 826, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 830, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1191, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1325, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 53; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 53; Ga. L. 1984, p. 937, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 53; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, §§ 21, 22; Ga. L. 1988, p. 347, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 881, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 294, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 350, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1173, § 4.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 471 (1988).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 491 (1990).

For annual survey article on law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 45 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (1993).